Georgia, session 2025_26, HB846.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
(a) For the purposes of this Act, the terms used in this Act shall have the same meaning as
such terms are defined in Part 4 of Article 2A of Chapter 8 of Title 48 of the O.C.G.A., the
"Alternative Homestead Option Sales and Use Tax Act," as amended.
(b) Each resident of Cherokee County is granted an additional exemption on that person's
homestead from all Cherokee County ad valorem taxes for county purposes in an amount
authorized by and calculated pursuant to Part 4 of Article 2A of Chapter 8 of Title 48 of the
H. B. 846
- 1 -

LC 47 3590/AP
O.C.G.A., as amended, for the immediately preceding taxable year as determined by the tax
commissioner of Cherokee County. This homestead exemption shall commence on January
1 of the year immediately following the first complete calendar year in which the sales and
use tax was levied under Part 4 of Article 2A of Chapter 8 of Title 48 of the O.C.G.A, as
amended. The value of that property in excess of such exempted amount shall remain subject
to taxation.
(c) A person shall not receive the homestead exemption granted by subsection (b) of this
section unless such person or person's agent files an application with the tax commissioner
of Cherokee County, giving the person's age and such additional information relative to
receiving such exemption as will enable the tax commissioner of Cherokee County to make
a determination regarding the initial and continuing eligibility of such person for such
exemption. The tax commissioner of Cherokee County shall provide application forms for
this purpose.
(d) The exemption shall be claimed and returned as provided in Code Section 48-5-50.1 of
the O.C.G.A., as amended. The exemption shall be automatically renewed from year to year
so long as the person granted the homestead exemption under subsection (b) of this section
occupies the residence as a homestead. After a person has filed the proper application as
provided in subsection (c) of this section, it shall not be necessary to make application
thereafter for any year, and the exemption shall continue to be allowed to such person. It
shall be the duty of any person granted the homestead exemption under subsection (b) of this
section to notify the tax commissioner of Cherokee County in the event that such person for
any reason becomes ineligible for such exemption.
(e) The exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to or affect any
state ad valorem taxes, county or independent school district ad valorem taxes for educational
purposes, or municipal ad valorem taxes for municipal purposes. The homestead exemption
granted by subsection (b) of this section shall be in addition to and not in lieu of any other
homestead exemption applicable to Cherokee County ad valorem taxes for county purposes.
H. B. 846
- 2 -

LC 47 3590/AP
(f) The exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall only become effective if
the electors of the special district, the boundary of which is conterminous with Cherokee
County, approve the imposition of a local option sales and use tax pursuant to Part 4 of
Article 2A of Chapter 8 of Title 48 of the O.C.G.A., as amended, at a special election
conducted on the same date as the election provided for under Section 3 of this Act.
(g) The exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall apply to all taxable years
beginning on or after January 1 of the year specified by subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 2.
In accordance with the requirements of Article VII, Section II of the Constitution of the State
of Georgia, this Act shall not become law unless it receives the requisite two-thirds' majority
vote in both the Senate and the House of Representatives.
SECTION 3.
The election superintendent of Cherokee County shall call and conduct a special election as
provided in this section for the purpose of submitting this Act to the electors of Cherokee
County for approval or rejection. The election superintendent shall conduct that special
election on the Tuesday following the first Monday in November, 2025, and shall issue the
call and conduct that election as provided by general law. The election superintendent shall
cause the date and purpose of the election to be published once a week for two weeks
immediately preceding the date thereof in the official organ of Cherokee County. The ballot
shall have written or printed thereon the words:
"( ) YES Shall the Act be approved which provides a homestead exemption from
Cherokee County ad valorem taxes for county purposes of up to 100 percent
( ) NO as determined from the proceeds generated from the collection of a retail
homestead option sales and use tax for residents of Cherokee County?"
H. B. 846
- 3 -

LC 47 3590/AP
All persons desiring to vote for approval of the Act shall vote "Yes," and all persons desiring
to vote for rejection of the Act shall vote "No." If more than one-half of the votes cast on
such question are for approval of the Act, Section 1 of this Act shall become of full force and
effect immediately and shall be applicable to all taxable years specified by subsection (b) of
Section 1 of this Act. If the Act is not so approved, if the election is not conducted as
provided in this section, or if the condition specified in subsection (f) of Section 1 of this Act
is not met, Section 1 of this Act shall not become effective, and this Act shall be
automatically repealed on the 365th calendar day following the election date provided for in
this section. The expense of such election shall be borne by Cherokee County. It shall be
the election superintendent's duty to certify the result thereof to the Secretary of State. The
provisions of this section shall be mandatory upon the election superintendent and are not
intended as directory. If the election superintendent fails or refuses to comply with this
section, any elector of Cherokee County may apply for a writ of mandamus to compel the
election superintendent to perform his or her duties under this section. If the court finds that
the election superintendent has not complied with this section, the court shall fashion
appropriate relief requiring the election superintendent to call and conduct such election on
the date required by this section or on the next date authorized for special elections provided
for in Code Section 21-2-540 of the O.C.G.A.
SECTION 4.
Except as otherwise provided in Section 3 of this Act, this Act shall become effective upon
its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval, provided that
an Act to amend Article 2A of Chapter 8 of Title 48 of the O.C.G.A., relating to homestead
option sales and use tax, so as to provide for an alternative homestead option sales tax, is
enacted in the 2025 regular session of the General Assembly of Georgia. If such Act is not
approved, this Act shall not become effective and shall be automatically repealed on July 1,
2025.
H. B. 846
- 4 -

LC 47 3590/AP
SECTION 5.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 846
- 5 -